Illinois, session 104th, SB364.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal and Traffic Assessment Act is 5amended by changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 135/1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Criminal and Traffic Assessment Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-987, eff. 7-1-19.)